Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 16

Industrial Development

Code Commission Notes.

Former parts 1–3 of this chapter were deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 13-16-101 to 13-16-107 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

13-16-101. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Industrial Park Act.”

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-1301; T.C.A., § 13-16-201.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-201 to § 13-16-101 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Section 2 of Acts 1959, ch. 169 read:

“Declaration of policy. — The future growth of population in this state, the employment of its people, the proper utilization of its natural resources, and the strengthening of its economy will depend in large measure on growth of industry and related activities. In recent years, increasing numbers of plants seek location in industrial parks or districts where, in company with other plants, utilities and services may be jointly supplied, and in which suitable restrictions and standards of construction and performances may be applied. It is the intent of this act to facilitate the assembly of lands and the development of such industrial parks where feasible and necessary.”

Cross-References. Industrial development corporations, title 7, ch. 53.

Law Reviews.

Property Rights vs. Public Use: Analyzing Tennessee's Response to Kelo Eminent Domain Ruling (Scott Griswold), 43 Tenn B.J. 14 (2007).

Attorney General Opinions. Sale of city land for golf course, OAG 99-143, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (7/30/99).

13-16-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Governing body” means the board or body in which the general legislative powers of a municipality are vested;

“Industrial park” means land and rights, easements and franchises relating thereto, and may include adequate roads and streets, water and sewer facilities, utilities, and docks and terminals, as required for the use of industry, and such appurtenant land for necessary incidental use. “Industrial park” may also include a site for the establishment or location of a single industry;

“Industrial park agency” means the governing body, or the commission, board, or other agency to which powers under this part have been delegated by the governing body; and

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city or town in this state.

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-1302; T.C.A., § 13-16-202.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-202 to § 13-16-102 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

13-16-103. Powers of municipality.

Subject to the conditions of this part, any municipality has the power to:

Acquire land and rights and easements therein by gift, purchase, or eminent domain, and develop the land into industrial parks within or without the municipality or partially within and partially without the municipality, and maintain and operate such industrial parks; provided, that the power of eminent domain shall be exercised only for public use, as defined in § 29-17-102, and shall not be extended to or exercised with respect to property owned or held by a corporation which is subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission, the department of safety, and/or the department of transportation, and which itself possesses the power of eminent domain, except and unless:

No other property is reasonably available for the contemplated use;

The property to be taken is not reasonably necessary to the operation of the corporation owning or holding it; and

The taking will not interfere or be inconsistent with any public use for which the property is used or held;

Issue its bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of such industrial parks, and pledge its full faith and credit and/or fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the use of or in connection with any industrial building or any public works project as provided in the Industrial Building Bond Act of 1955, compiled in title 7, chapter 55, or the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21;

Sell or lease plots of land and charge and collect fees for services made available within such industrial parks, subject to and in accordance with any agreement which may be made with bondholders; provided, except as set forth in § 13-16-107(a), that prices, rentals and fees shall be fixed and revised from time to time so as to produce, as nearly as possible, sufficient funds to provide for the prompt payment of principal and interest upon all bonds when due, and provide for the operation and maintenance of such parks and adequate depreciation accounts in connection therewith;

Pledge to the punctual payment of the bonds authorized for such purposes and interest thereon the income, revenues and proceeds from sales to be received from such industrial parks;

Accept grants and the cooperation of the state of Tennessee upon such conditions as may be provided by law;

Accept grants and the cooperation of the United States or any agency thereof in the development, maintenance, operation and financing of industrial parks and do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid and cooperation; and

Exercise all powers with respect to industrial parks that municipalities may exercise with respect to industrial buildings under the Industrial Building Bond Act of 1955, and the Industrial Development Corporations Act of 1955, compiled in title 7, chapter 53.

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 5; T.C.A., § 13-1303; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 47; 1990, ch. 593, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 99; 2017, ch. 94, § 33; 2017, ch. 422, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-16-203.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-203 to § 13-16-103 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 422, § 7 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to takings or condemnation actions initiated on or after May 18, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal power to acquire land for industrial park, OAG 95-121, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 139 (12/18/95).

Projects outside municipal limits financed under Local Public Obligations Act, OAG 96-005, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/16/96).

Under T.C.A. § 5-1-114(a), contiguous counties may cooperate to develop an industrial park through an interlocal agreement, OAG 03-020, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/24/03).

Because development of an industrial park could be a “county general purpose” and a “public purpose,” counties may use property tax revenues generated by the industrial park to fulfill terms and conditions of an interlocal agreement, OAG 03-020, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/24/03).

13-16-104. Control of industrial parks.

The governing body of any municipality may exercise direct control in the development, operation and maintenance of any industrial park, or may delegate by ordinance or resolution any or all powers to a commission or board, the composition, terms of office, appointment, and compensation to be determined by the governing body in such ordinance or resolution.

Such powers may be delegated to an industrial development corporation created under title 7, chapter 53, to any existing port authority, to a regional megasite authority created under title 64, chapter 6 or to similar bodies available to act as an instrumentality of the municipality.

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-1304; Acts 2009, ch. 158, § 16; T.C.A., § 13-16-204.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-204 to § 13-16-104 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

13-16-105. Provision for public services.

Public services required by industries should be provided by governmental and private units and agencies responsible for such services in areas encompassing industrial parks, such as financing and installation of utility services and utility agencies, construction and maintenance of service roads and streets, and storm sewers where needed, by counties or cities, and building of dock and harbor facilities by counties, cities or port authorities.

Governmental and private units and agencies are empowered to provide such services in connection with the development of industrial parks under this part.

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-1305; T.C.A., § 13-16-205.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-205 to § 13-16-105 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

13-16-106. Municipalities acting jointly.

The powers conferred upon municipalities under this part may be exercised by two (2) or more municipalities acting jointly, in which event the governing bodies of the municipalities acting jointly shall provide by contract the manner of development, operation and maintenance of industrial parks, or the powers may be delegated by resolution to a joint commission or board, the composition, terms of office, appointment, and compensation of same to be fixed by agreement of the governing bodies of such municipalities acting jointly. Such powers may also be delegated to an industrial development corporation created under title 7, chapter 53, to a port authority, to a regional megasite authority created under title 64, chapter 6, or to similar bodies available to act as instrumentalities of municipalities as specified in § 13-16-104.

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 7; T.C.A., § 13-1306; Acts 2009, ch. 158, § 17; T.C.A., § 13-16-206.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-206 to § 13-16-106 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

13-16-107. Certificate requirements.

Before a municipality may undertake to borrow funds to develop an industrial park under this part, it must obtain a certificate of public purpose and necessity under title 7, chapter 55, except that § 7-55-106 shall not apply to such certificate for an industrial park. The committee shall investigate, find and determine, upon application of any municipality therefor, as to whether a certificate of public purpose and necessity shall be issued to such municipality to engage in the establishment of an industrial park project under the declared public policy of this part for the economic development and advancement of the municipality, and in considering and determining whether or not such certificate shall issue, the committee shall find and determine affirmatively that:

The project is well conceived and has a reasonable prospect of success;

There is a good probability that the project will be self-sustaining from the sale and lease of land in the industrial park, utility revenues derived from the provision and sale of utilities in the industrial park, ad valorem and other taxes resulting directly from the development of the industrial park, and other fees and charges for services provided to the industrial park;

The project will tend to provide proper economic development of the municipality, and will encourage industry to locate there; and

There are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions, so that the total bonded indebtedness of the municipality, solely for the purposes authorized by this part and by title 7, chapter 55, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the municipality ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of the issuance of such bonds.

Until December 31, 1992, the requirement for obtaining such certificate of public purpose and necessity shall be waived for an industrial park for which sixty percent (60%) of its funding for the second phase of development was provided by a federal grant received from the economic development administration and which on July 1, 1992, is in the final stages of completing such second phase.

When the committee has determined such facts favorably, it is authorized and empowered, having due regard to the promotion of the public policy and the general welfare herein declared, to issue a certificate of public purpose and necessity to the municipality to engage in the project. If and when such certificate is issued, it shall authorize the particular municipality to do all of the things authorized under § 13-16-103, including the issuance of bonds for the development of the industrial park and the securing of such bonds with income, revenues and proceeds from the sale of property in the municipality, any or all utility revenues of the municipality, any or all tax revenues of the municipality, including ad valorem taxes, and any other revenues, fees, rentals or charges of the municipality, or any of the foregoing as shall be approved by the committee. The certificate shall expire thirty-six (36) months from its date unless, within that time, such industrial park shall have been established; subject, however, to any delays necessitated by any litigation or acts of God; delaying the establishment of the industrial park. The issuance of such certificate of public purpose and necessity may be made contingent on the applicant supplying reasonable and satisfactory maps of the area proposed for development as an industrial park and preliminary development plans, including competent estimates of the cost of site preparation and supplying of projected utilities and services, and the extent to which appropriate private or local government agencies are prepared to supply them.

If and when the certificate is issued, the committee therein shall fix and determine:

The extent and the amount to which the municipality may issue bonds or make expenditures for such industrial park;

What property may be acquired therefor; and

The terms upon which such acquisition may be had.

If the governing body of the municipality fails or refuses to follow the requirements made by the committee in the certificate, then the members of the governing body of the municipality voting for such failure or refusal shall be individually and personally liable, and liable on their official bonds for any loss that the municipality may sustain by reason of such failure or refusal to follow such requirements, and in addition may be compelled by injunction to comply with such requirements.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this part not inconsistent herewith.

When used in this section, “industrial park project” or “project” means the acquisition of land, rights, easements and franchises relating thereto and/or the provision of any roads and streets, water and sewer facilities, utilities, docks and terminals, as well as any appurtenant land that may be reasonably necessary for incidental use thereof. This subsection (d) does not limit the authority of the committee to issue a certificate of public purpose and necessity for the purchase and/or development of a site for the location of a single industry.

Notwithstanding this section, a municipality with a population not less than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall not be required to obtain a certificate of public purpose and necessity in order to borrow funds to develop an industrial park under this part. Any such municipality that makes a total pledge of full faith and credit of the municipality related to an industrial park project shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of all property in the municipality, ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of issuance of the obligations. In any resolution pledging the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of any such municipality to secure any obligations related to the project, the governing body of the municipality shall state that the project being considered is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect for success, will provide proper economic development and employment, and will not likely become a burden on the taxpayers of the municipality.

A city or county may exercise the power of eminent domain for development of an industrial park, only with respect to property located within the jurisdictional boundaries of the city or county; or in the case of a city, also with respect to property within an urban growth boundary as defined in § 6-58-101; or in the case of a county, also with respect to property within an urban growth boundary or planned growth area as defined in § 6-58-101. Either a city or town and county, or both, operating a joint industrial park may exercise the power of eminent domain with respect to property located within the jurisdictional boundaries of the county and within an urban growth boundary and a planned growth area. Before a city or county may undertake to exercise the power of eminent domain for development of an industrial park, it must obtain a certificate of public purpose and necessity as provided in subsection (a), even if no funds will be borrowed for the project, except:

The requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(A)(iv) are not applicable to a certificate of public purpose and necessity obtained solely for the exercise of eminent domain authority; and

A certificate of public purpose and necessity for the exercise of eminent domain, in addition to the applicable findings set forth in subdivision (a)(1)(A), shall be based on a finding that the city or county has been unable, through good faith negotiations, to acquire the property to be acquired by eminent domain or any alternative property that would be of comparable suitability for the project. Good faith negotiations shall be established, if the city or county has made an offer to purchase the property for an amount equal to or in excess of the fair market value, determined by the average of at least two (2) appraisals by independent, qualified appraisers.

Acts 1959, ch. 169, § 8; 1963, ch. 251, § 1; 1969, ch. 193, § 1; 1972, ch. 797, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-1307; Acts 1989, ch. 394, §§ 1-3; 1990, ch. 593, §§ 3-5; 1992, ch. 945, § 3; 2006, ch. 770, §§ 3, 4; 2006, ch. 863, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-16-207.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 13-16-207 to § 13-16-107 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

For table of certified populations figures of Tennessee municipalities, see the supplement to Volume 13.

Cross-References. Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.